California statutes. Insurance Code
(1) A disability insurer shall not require prior authorization for services provided pursuant to this section.

(2) A disability insurer may conduct a postclaim review to determine appropriate payment of the claim. Payment for services subject to this section may be denied only if the disability insurer reasonably determines that the services were provided to a student not covered by the insurer, were never performed, or were not provided by a health care provider appropriately licensed or authorized to provide the services.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a disability insurer may require prior authorization for services as authorized by the commissioner, pursuant to subdivision (d).

(4) A local educational agency,
 community college district, the California State University system, or the Regents of the University of California may consolidate claims for purposes of submission to a disability insurer.

(5) A disability insurer shall provide reimbursement for services provided to students pursuant to this section at the greater of either of the following amounts:

(A) The disability insurer’s contracted rate with the local educational agency, institution of higher education, or health care provider, if any.

(B) The fee-for-service reimbursement rate published by the State Department of Health Care Services for the same or similar services provided in an outpatient setting, pursuant to Section 5961.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(6) A disability insurer shall
 provide reimbursement for services provided pursuant to this section in compliance with the requirements for timely payment of claims as required by this chapter.

(7) Services provided pursuant to this section shall not be subject to copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other form of cost sharing.

(8) An individual or entity shall not bill the policyholder or insured, nor seek reimbursement from the policyholder or insured, for services provided pursuant to this section.

(d) The commissioner shall issue guidance to disability insurers regarding compliance with this
 section, as well as requirements necessary to comply with Section 5961.4 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Guidance issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be effective only until the commissioner adopts regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 999, Sec. 4.   (AB 177)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.54.

(a) An insurance policy issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after July 1, 2023, shall cover the cost of developing an evaluation pursuant to Section 5977.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the provision of all health care services for an insured when required or recommended for the insured pursuant to a CARE agreement or CARE plan approved by a court in accordance with the court’s authority under Sections 5977.1, 5977.2, 5977.3, and 5982 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, regardless of whether the service is delivered by an in-network or out-of-network provider.

(b) (1) An insurer shall not require prior authorization for services, other than prescription drugs, provided pursuant to a CARE agreement or
 CARE plan approved by a court pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 5970) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) An insurer may conduct a postclaim review to determine appropriate payment of a claim. Payment for services subject to this section may be denied only if the insurer reasonably determines the insured was not insured at the time the services were rendered, the services were never performed, or the services were not provided by a health care provider appropriately licensed or authorized to provide the services.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an insurer may require prior authorization for services as permitted by the department pursuant to subdivision (e).

(c) (1) An insurer shall provide for reimbursement of services provided to an insured pursuant to this
 section, other than prescription drugs, at the greater of either of the following amounts:

(A) The insurer’s contracted rate with the provider.

(B) The fee-for-service or case reimbursement rate paid in the Medi-Cal program for the same or similar services as identified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) An insurer shall provide for reimbursement of prescription drugs provided to an insured pursuant to this section at the insurer’s contracted rate. 

(3) An insurer shall provide reimbursement for services provided pursuant to this section in compliance with the requirements for timely payment of claims, as required by this chapter.

(d) Services provided to an insured
 pursuant to a CARE agreement or CARE plan, excluding prescription drugs, shall not be subject to copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other form of cost sharing. An individual or entity shall not bill the insured, nor seek reimbursement from the insured, for services provided pursuant to a CARE agreement or CARE plan, regardless of whether the service is delivered by an in-network or out-of-network provider.

(e) No later than July 1, 2023, the department may issue guidance to insurers regarding compliance with this section. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Guidance issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be effective only until the department adopts regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

(f) This section does not
 excuse an insurer from complying with Section 10144.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.55.

(a) Every policy of disability income insurance, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 799.01, that is of a short-term limited duration of two years or less, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2014, and that provides disability income benefits shall provide coverage for disability caused by severe mental illnesses.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “severe mental illnesses” shall include:

(1) Schizophrenia.

(2) Schizoaffective disorder.

(3) Bipolar disorder
 (manic-depressive illness).

(4) Major depressive disorders, including postpartum depression.

(5) Panic disorder.

(6) Obsessive-compulsive disorder.

(7) Pervasive developmental disorder or autism.

(8) Anorexia nervosa.

(9) Bulimia nervosa.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 26.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.56.

(a) For provider contracts issued, amended, or renewed on and after January 1, 2023, a disability insurer that provides coverage for mental health and substance use disorders and that credentials health care providers of those services for its networks shall assess and verify the qualifications of a health care provider within 60 days after receiving a completed provider credentialing application. Upon receipt of the application by the credentialing department, the disability insurer shall notify the applicant within seven business days, to verify receipt and inform the applicant whether the application is complete. The 60-day timeline shall apply only to the credentialing process and does not include contracting
 completion.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “mental health and substance use disorder” and “health care provider” have the same meanings as defined in Section 10144.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (AB 2581)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.565.

Except as provided in Section 10144.56, within one year of the operative date of this section, a health insurer or its delegate that credentials health care providers for its networks shall make a determination regarding the credentials of a health care provider within 90 days after receiving a completed provider credentialing
 application, including all required third-party verifications. Upon receipt of the application by the credentialing department, the health insurer or its delegate shall notify the applicant within 10 business days to verify receipt and inform the applicant whether the application is complete. The health insurer shall activate the provider upon successful approval and notify the applicant of the activation within 10 days of approval if the approval occurs prior to the end of the 90-day timeline. The 90-day timeline shall apply only to the credentialing process and does not include contracting completion. If the health insurer or its
 delegate does not meet the 90-day requirement, the applicant’s credentials shall be provisionally approved for 120 days unless any of the following apply:

(a) The applicant is subject to discipline by the licensing entity for that applicant.

(b) The applicant has one or more adverse action reports or one or more reports of malpractice payments filed with the National Practitioner Data Bank.

(c) The applicant has not been credentialed by the health insurer in the past five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 630, Sec. 4.   (AB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.57.

(a) Coverage of mental health and substance use disorder treatment pursuant to Section 10144.5 includes behavioral health crisis services that are provided to an insured by a 988 center, mobile crisis team,
 or other provider of behavioral health crisis services, as set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 53123.1) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, regardless of whether the service is provided by an in-network or out-of-network provider or facility. With respect to behavioral health crisis services that are provided to an insured by a 988 center or mobile crisis team, a health insurance policy shall cover, at a minimum, all items and services that are eligible for coverage under the Medi-Cal program.

(b) (1) An insurer shall not require prior
 authorization for
 behavioral health crisis stabilization services and care provided by a 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, payment for behavioral health crisis stabilization services and care pursuant to this section shall not be denied unless a health insurer reasonably determines that care was not rendered.

(3) If its prior authorization requirements comply with
 Section 10144.4, a health insurer may require prior authorization for poststabilization care. If there is a disagreement between a health insurer and behavioral health crisis services provider or facility regarding the need for poststabilization care, an insurer shall assume responsibility for care of the insured by promptly arranging for care pursuant to Section 10144.5 at a level of care determined in accordance with utilization review criteria under Section 10144.52.

(4) An insurer shall not require, under any circumstances, a behavioral health crisis services provider or facility to discharge or transfer an insured before stabilization has occurred or before it has conducted utilization review in accordance with Sections 10144.5 and 10144.52.

(c) (1) If prior authorization is required for poststabilization care, a health insurer that is contacted by a 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services shall, within 30 minutes of the time the provider makes the initial contact, either authorize poststabilization care or inform the provider that it will arrange for the prompt transfer of the insured’s care to another provider.

(2) A health insurer that is contacted by a 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services shall reimburse the provider or facility for poststabilization care rendered to the insured if any of the following occur:

(A) The health insurer authorized the 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services to provide poststabilization care.

(B) The health insurer did not respond to the provider’s initial contact or did not make a decision regarding whether to authorize poststabilization care or to promptly transfer the insured’s care within the timeframe set forth in paragraph (1).

(C) There is an unreasonable delay in the transfer of the insured’s care to another provider, and the provider determines that the insured requires poststabilization care.

(3) A health insurer shall prominently display on its internet website the specific telephone number for noncontracting providers to obtain prompt authorization for the transfer of a stabilized insured’s care to another provider or authorization to provide poststabilization care. The health insurer shall ensure the telephone number published on its internet website is the correct telephone number for purposes of
 this paragraph. The health insurer shall update the telephone number on its internet website within one business day if the telephone number changes. A health insurer shall provide the telephone number to the department.

(4) A health insurer shall not require a 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services to make more than one telephone call to the number provided in advance by the health insurer. The representative of the 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services that makes the telephone call may be, but is not required to be, a physician or surgeon.

(5) A 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services shall not bill a patient who is an insured of a health insurer for poststabilization care, except for the in-network cost-sharing amount as defined in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). An insured who is billed in violation of this section may report receipt of the bill to the health insurer and the department. The department shall forward that report to the State Department of Public Health.

(d) (1) An insurer shall reimburse a 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services for
 emergency or nonemergency behavioral health crisis services and care pursuant to this section, consistent with the requirements of Sections 10123.13, 10123.147, and any other applicable requirement of this part.

(2) If an insured receives behavioral health crisis services and care pursuant to this section from a 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services that is an out-of-network provider, the insured shall pay no more than the same cost sharing that the insured would pay for the same
 items or services received from an in-network provider. This amount shall be referred to as the “in-network cost-sharing amount.” An out-of-network 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider of behavioral health crisis services shall not bill or collect an amount from the insured for services subject to this section except for the in-network cost-sharing amount.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Behavioral health crisis services” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 53123.1.5 of the Government Code.

(2) “Behavioral health crisis stabilization services” means health care items and services that are necessary to determine if a behavioral health crisis exists and, if a behavioral health crisis does exist, the care and treatment that is necessary to stabilize the behavioral health crisis, within the capability of the 988 center, mobile crisis team, or other provider
 of behavioral health crisis services.

(3) “Poststabilization care” means medically necessary care provided after a behavioral health crisis has been stabilized.

(4) An insured is “stabilized” or “stabilization” has occurred when, in the opinion of the treating provider or facility, the insured’s condition is such that, within reasonable medical probability, both of the following criteria are satisfied:

(A) Material deterioration of the insured’s condition is unlikely to result from, or occur during, the discharge or transfer of the insured to the care of another provider or facility.

(B) The insured is able to travel safely from the site of care using nonmedical transportation or nonemergency medical transportation. The health insurer shall continue to
 cover all services and care as behavioral health crisis stabilization services until the insured is discharged or transferred.

(f) This section does not excuse a disability insurer from complying with Section 10144.5 or any other requirement of this part.

(g) This section does not apply to
 Medicare supplement, dental-only, or vision-only health insurance policies.

(h) The commissioner may promulgate regulations subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this section, and Section 10144.4, 10144.5, 10144.51, or 10144.52 of this code. This subdivision shall not be construed to impair or restrict the commissioner’s rulemaking authority pursuant to another provision of this code or the Administrative Procedure
 Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 56.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.58.

For services provided to an insured under a disability insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2025, a disability insurer subject to Section 10144.5, and its delegates, shall establish a process to reimburse providers for mental health and substance use disorder treatment services that are integrated with primary care services. A process required under this section may be based upon federal rules or guidance issued for the Medicare program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 135, Sec. 2.   (SB 1320)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10144.6.

No disability insurer may utilize any information regarding whether a beneficiary’s psychiatric inpatient admission was made on a voluntary or involuntary basis for the purpose of determining eligibility for claim reimbursement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 506, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10145.

No insurer issuing, providing, or administering any contract of individual or group insurance providing life, annuity, or disability benefits applied for and issued on or after January 1, 1986, shall refuse to insure, or refuse to continue to insure, or limit the amount, extent, or kind of coverage available to an individual, or charge a different rate for the same coverage solely because of blindness or partial blindness.

“Blindness or partial blindness” means central visual acuity of not more than 20/200 in the better eye, after correction, or visual acuity greater than 20/200 but with a limitation in the fields of vision so that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees, certified by a licensed physician and surgeon who specializes in diseases of the eye or a licensed optometrist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 971, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10145.2.

(a) Every policy of disability insurance that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2002, that covers hospital, medical, or surgery expenses shall provide coverage for a vaccine for acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) that is approved for marketing by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that is recommended by the United States Public Health Service.

(b) This section may not be construed to require a policy to provide coverage for any clinical trials relating to an AIDS vaccine or for any AIDS vaccine that has been approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration in the form of an investigational new drug application.

(c) This section shall not apply to vision only, dental only, accident only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, CHAMPUS supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance. For hospital indemnity, accident only, or specified disease insurance coverage, benefits under this section shall apply only to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy or certificate. Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on accident only, hospital indemnity, or specified disease insurance.

(d) Nothing in this section is to be construed in any manner to limit or impede a disability insurer’s power or responsibility to negotiate the most cost-effective price for vaccine purchases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 634, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10145.3.

(a) Every disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical benefits shall provide an external, independent review process to examine the insurer’s coverage decisions regarding experimental or investigational therapies for individual insureds who meet all of the following criteria:

(1) (A) The insured has a life-threatening or seriously debilitating condition.

(B) For purposes of this section, “life-threatening” means either or both of the following:

(i) Diseases or conditions where the likelihood of death is high unless the course of the disease is
 interrupted.

(ii) Diseases or conditions with potentially fatal outcomes, where the end point of clinical intervention is survival.

(C) For purposes of this section, “seriously debilitating” means diseases or conditions that cause major irreversible morbidity.

(2) The insured’s physician certifies that the insured has a condition, as defined in paragraph (1), for which standard therapies have not been effective in improving the condition of the insured, for which standard therapies would not be medically appropriate for the insured, or for which there is no more beneficial standard therapy covered by the insurer than the therapy proposed pursuant to paragraph (3).

(3) Either (A) the insured’s contracting physician has recommended a drug, device,
 procedure, or other therapy that the physician certifies in writing is likely to be more beneficial to the insured than any available standard therapies, or (B) the insured, or the insured’s physician who is a licensed, board-certified or board-eligible physician qualified to practice in the area of practice appropriate to treat the insured’s condition, has requested a therapy that, based on two documents from the medical and scientific evidence, as defined in subdivision (d), is likely to be more beneficial for the insured than any available standard therapy. The physician certification pursuant to this subdivision shall include a statement of the evidence relied upon by the physician in certifying his or her recommendation. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the insurer to pay for the services of a noncontracting physician, provided pursuant to this subdivision, that are not otherwise covered pursuant to the contract.

(4) The insured has been denied coverage by the insurer for a drug, device, procedure, or other therapy recommended or requested pursuant to paragraph (3), unless coverage for the specific therapy has been excluded by the insurer’s contract.

(5) The specific drug, device, procedure, or other therapy recommended pursuant to paragraph (3) would be a covered service except for the insurer’s determination that the therapy is experimental or under investigation.

(b) The insurer’s decision to deny, delay, or modify experimental or investigational therapies shall be subject to the independent medical review process established under Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 10169) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2, except that in lieu of the information specified in subdivision (b) of Section 10169.3, an independent medical reviewer shall base his or her determination on
 relevant medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to, the medical and scientific evidence defined in subdivision (d).

(c) The independent medical review process shall also meet the following criteria:

(1) The insurer shall notify eligible insureds in writing of the opportunity to request the external independent review within five business days of the decision to deny coverage.

(2) If the insured’s physician determines that the proposed therapy would be significantly less effective if not promptly initiated, the analyses and recommendations of the experts on the panel shall be rendered within seven days of the request for expedited review. At the request of the expert, the deadline shall be extended by up to three days for a delay in providing the documents required. The timeframes specified in
 this paragraph shall be in addition to any otherwise applicable timeframes contained in subdivision (c) of Section 10169.3.

(3) Each expert’s analysis and recommendation shall be in written form and state the reasons the requested therapy is or is not likely to be more beneficial for the insured than any available standard therapy, and the reasons that the expert recommends that the therapy should or should not be covered by the insurer, citing the insured’s specific medical condition, the relevant documents, and the relevant medical and scientific evidence, including, but not limited to, the medical and scientific evidence as defined in subdivision (d), to support the expert’s recommendation.

(4) Coverage for the services required under this section shall be provided subject to the terms and conditions generally applicable to other benefits under the contract.

(d) For the purposes of subdivision (b), “medical and scientific evidence” means the following sources:

(1) Peer-reviewed scientific studies published in or accepted for publication by medical journals that meet nationally recognized requirements for scientific manuscripts and that submit most of their published articles for review by experts who are not part of the editorial staff.

(2) Peer-reviewed literature, biomedical compendia and other medical literature that meet the criteria of the National Institutes of Health’s National Library of Medicine for indexing in Index Medicus, Excerpta Medicus (EMBASE), Medline and MEDLARS database of Health Services Technology Assessment Research (HSTAR).

(3) Medical journals recognized by the Secretary of Health and
 Human Services, under Section 1861(t)(2) of the Social Security Act.

(4) Either of the following reference compendia:

(A) The American Hospital Formulary Service’s Drug Information.

(B) The American Dental Association Accepted Dental Therapeutics.

(5) Any of the following reference compendia, if recognized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as part of an anticancer chemotherapeutic regimen:

(A) The Elsevier Gold Standard’s Clinical Pharmacology.

(B) The National Comprehensive Cancer Network Drug and Biologics Compendium.

(C) The Thomson
 Micromedex DrugDex.

(6) Findings, studies, or research conducted by or under the auspices of federal government agencies and nationally recognized federal research institutes, including the Federal Agency for Health Care Policy and Research, National Institutes of Health, National Cancer Institute, National Academy of Sciences, Health Care Financing Administration, Congressional Office of Technology Assessment, and any national board recognized by the National Institutes of Health for the purpose of evaluating the medical value of health services.

(7) Peer-reviewed abstracts accepted for presentation at major medical association meetings.

(e) The independent review process established by this section shall be required on and after January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 479, Sec. 4.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10145.4.

(a) An individual or group health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2020, shall not:

(1) Deny a qualified insured’s participation in an approved clinical trial.

(2) Deny, limit, or impose additional conditions on the coverage of routine patient care
 costs for items and services furnished in connection with a qualified insured’s participation in an approved clinical trial.

(3) Discriminate against an insured based on the qualified insured’s participation in an approved clinical trial.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) applies to:

(A) A qualified insured participating in an approved clinical trial conducted by a participating provider.

(B) A qualified insured participating in an approved clinical trial conducted by a nonparticipating provider, including a nonparticipating provider located outside this state, if the clinical trial is not offered or available through a participating provider.

(2) If one or more participating providers is conducting an approved clinical trial, a health insurer may require a qualified insured to participate in the clinical trial through a participating provider if the participating provider accepts the insured as a clinical trial participant.

(3) A health insurer may restrict coverage to an approved clinical trial in this state, unless the clinical trial is not offered or available through a participating provider in this state.

(c) (1) The payment rate for routine patient care costs provided by a nonparticipating provider under a policy that is issued, amended,
 or renewed on or after January 1, 2020, shall be the negotiated rate the health insurer would otherwise pay a participating provider for the same services, less applicable cost sharing.

(2) Cost sharing for routine patient care costs shall be the same as that applied to the same services not delivered in a clinical trial, except that the in-network cost sharing and out-of-pocket maximum shall apply if the clinical trial is not offered or available through a participating provider.

(3) This section does not limit or modify any existing requirements under this chapter or prevent application of cost-sharing
 provisions in a policy, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Approved clinical trial” means a phase I, phase II, phase III, or phase IV clinical trial conducted in relation to the prevention, detection, or treatment of cancer or another life-threatening disease or condition that meets at least one of the following:

(A) The study or investigation is approved or funded, which may include funding through in-kind donations, by one or more of the following:

(i) The National Institutes of Health.

(ii) The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

(iii) The Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality.

(iv) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(v) A cooperative group or center of any of the entities described in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive, the Department of Defense, or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(vi) A qualified nongovernmental research entity identified in the guidelines issued by the National Institutes of Health for center support grants.

(vii) One of the following departments, if the study or investigation
 has been reviewed and approved through a system of peer review that the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services determines is comparable to the system of peer review used by the National Institutes of Health and ensures unbiased review of the highest scientific standards by qualified individuals who have no interest in the outcome of the review:

(I) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(II) The United States Department of Defense.

(III) The United States Department of Energy.

(B) The study or investigation is conducted under an investigational new drug application reviewed by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(C) The study or investigation is a drug trial that is exempt from an investigational new drug application reviewed by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(2) “Life-threatening disease or condition” means a disease or condition from which the likelihood of death is probable, unless the course of the disease or condition is interrupted.

(3) “Qualified insured” means an insured who meets both of the following conditions:

(A) The insured is
 eligible to participate in an approved clinical trial, according to the clinical trial protocol, for the treatment of cancer or another life-threatening disease or condition.

(B) Either of the following applies:

(i) The referring health care professional is a participating provider and has concluded that the insured’s participation in the clinical trial would be appropriate because the insured meets the conditions of subparagraph (A).

(ii) The insured provides medical and scientific information establishing that the insured’s participation in the clinical
 trial would be appropriate because the insured meets the conditions of subparagraph (A).

(4) “Routine patient care costs” include drugs, items, devices, and services provided consistent with coverage under the policy for an insured who is not enrolled in an approved clinical trial, including the following:

(A) Drugs, items, devices, and services typically covered absent a clinical trial.

(B) Drugs, items, devices, and services required solely for the provision of an investigational drug, item, device, or service.

(C) Drugs, items, devices, and services required for the clinically appropriate monitoring of the investigational drug, item,
 device, or service.

(D) Drugs, items, devices, and services provided for the prevention of complications arising from the provision of the investigational drug, item, device, or service.

(E) Drugs, items, devices, and services needed for the reasonable and necessary care arising from the provision of the investigational drug, item, device, or service, including diagnosis and treatment of complications.

(5) “Routine patient care costs” does not include the following:

(A) The investigational drug, item, device, or service itself.

(B) Drugs, items, devices, and services provided solely to satisfy data
 collection and analysis needs that are not used in the direct clinical management of the insured.

(C) Drugs, items, devices, and services specifically excluded from coverage in the policy, except for drugs, items, devices, and services required to be covered pursuant to this section or other applicable law.

(D) Drugs, items, devices, and services customarily provided free of charge to a clinical trial participant by the research sponsor.

(e) This section shall not be construed to limit coverage provided by a health insurance policy with respect to clinical
 trials.

(f) The provision of services required by this section shall not, in itself, give rise to liability on the part of the health insurer.

(g) This section does not apply to vision-only, dental-only, accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, CHAMPUS supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance policies, except that for specified disease and hospital indemnity insurance, coverage for benefits under this section shall apply, but only to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other
 benefits under the policy. This section shall not be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on specified disease or hospital indemnity insurance.

(h) This section does not limit, prohibit, or modify an insured’s rights to the independent review process available under Section 10145.3 or to the Independent Medical Review System available under Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 10169).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 482, Sec. 4.   (SB 583)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Underwriting on the Basis of Test of Genetic Characteristics [10146. - 10149.1.]

10146.

The purposes of this article are to establish standards regarding unfair discrimination among individuals of the same class in the underwriting of life or disability income insurance on the basis of tests of a person’s genetic characteristics; to establish minimum standards for determining insurability which are sufficiently reliable to be used for life and disability income insurance risk classification and underwriting purposes; to require the maintenance of strict confidentiality of personal information obtained through a test of a person’s genetic characteristics; and to require informed consent before insurers underwrite on the basis of a test of a person’s genetic characteristics. This article and Sections 10140 and 10143 shall constitute the exclusive requirements for insurers’ practices relating to genetic characteristics or to tests thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 761, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10147.

As used in this article:

(a) “Disability income insurance” means insurance against loss of occupational earning capacity arising from injury, sickness, or disablement, and includes insurance which provides benefits for overhead expenses of a business or profession when the insured becomes disabled.

(b) “Genetic characteristics” means any scientifically or medically identifiable gene or chromosome, or alteration thereof, that is known to be a cause of a disease or disorder, or that is determined to be associated with a statistically increased risk of development of a disease or disorder, and that is presently not associated with any symptoms of any disease or disorder.

(c) “Life or disability income insurer” means an insurer licensed to transact life insurance or disability income insurance in this state or a fraternal benefit society licensed in this state.

(d) “Policy” means (1) a life insurance policy or a disability income insurance policy delivered in this state, or (2) a certificate of life insurance benefits or disability income insurance benefits, issued under a group life or disability income insurance policy and delivered in this state by a life or disability income insurer or a fraternal benefits society, regardless of the location of the group master policy.

(e) “Test of a person’s genetic characteristics” means a laboratory test which is generally accepted in the scientific and medical communities for the determination of the presence or absence of genetic characteristics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 311, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10148.

No insurer shall require a test for the presence of a genetic characteristic for the purpose of determining insurability other than for those policies that are contingent on review or testing for other diseases or medical conditions. In those cases, the test shall be done in accordance with the informed consent and privacy protection provisions of this article and Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this constitutes the exclusive requirements for informed consent and privacy protection for that testing.
